Hawaii statutes.
§490:3-111 Place of payment. Except as
otherwise provided for items in article 4, an instrument is payable at the
place of payment stated in the instrument. If no place of payment is stated,
an instrument is payable at the address of the drawee or maker stated in the
instrument. If no address is stated, the place of payment is the place of
business of the drawee or maker. If a drawee or maker has more than one place
of business, the place of payment is any place of business of the drawee or
maker chosen by the person entitled to enforce the instrument. If the drawee
or maker has no place of business, the place of payment is the residence of the
drawee or maker. [L 1991, c 118, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next